Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 3

Health, Educational and Housing Facility Corporations

48-101-301. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bonds” means bonds, notes, interim certificates, or other obligations of a corporation issued pursuant to this part;

“Clinic,” except in the context of a hospital-based facility, means a not for profit, out-patient, nonhospital facility providing:

Primary health care;

Dental care;

Eye care;

Child delivery or birthing facilities; or

Any other out-patient healthcare service;

“Contracting party” or “other contracting party” means any party to a sale contract or loan agreement except the corporation;

“Corporation” means any corporation organized pursuant to this part;

“Educational institutions for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability” means any institution organized for-profit or not for profit authorized by law to provide a program for educating and training individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability;

“Enterprise” means the health, educational or housing operations to be carried on with the facilities of a project;

“Governing body” means the legislative body of a county or the board or other body in which the general legislative powers of a city or town are vested;

“Hospital institution” means any city, county, metropolitan government, or other local governmental entity, or any institution organized for-profit or not for profit authorized by law to provide congregate elderly facilities or extended care, hospital, or nursing home facilities in this state, or any finance subsidiary of such hospital institution;

“Housing” means any multi-family housing facilities to be occupied by persons of low and/or moderate income, and/or elderly, and/or handicapped persons as may be determined by the board of directors, which determination shall be conclusive;

“Institution for higher education” means any institution organized for-profit or not for profit authorized by law to provide a program of education at the primary level, secondary level or beyond the secondary level in this state;

“Lease” includes a lease containing an option to purchase the project for a nominal sum upon payment in full, or provision therefor, of all bonds issued in connection with the project and all interest thereon and all other expenses in connection with the project, and a lease containing an option to purchase the project at any time, as provided therein, upon payment of the purchase price which shall be sufficient to pay all bonds issued in connection with the project and all interest thereon and all other expenses incurred in connection with the project, but which payment may be made in the form of one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds, or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the lessee providing for timely payments, including, but not limited to, interest thereon sufficient for such purposes and delivered to the corporation or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued;

“Loan agreement” means an agreement providing for a corporation to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of bonds pursuant to this part to one (1) or more contracting parties to be used to pay the cost of one (1) or more projects and providing for the repayment of such loan by the other contracting party or parties, and which may provide for such loans to be secured or evidenced by one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of the contracting party or parties, delivered to the corporation or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued;

“Multi-family housing facilities” or “Multi-family residential units” for a project in the case of a housing facility may include or consist of single family structures, on contiguous or non contiguous sites for such a project located in counties having a population in excess of eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town in this state with respect to which a corporation may be organized;

“Project,” in the case of an institution for higher education, means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by an institution for higher education in connection with its operations or proposed operations, including, but not limited to, a site therefor, an academic facility, administrative facility, agricultural facility, assembly hall, athletic facility, auditorium, campus, communication facility, computer facility, continuing education facility, classroom, dining hall, dormitory, exhibition hall, firefighting facility, fire prevention facility, food service and preparation facility, gymnasium, health care facility, hospital, housing, laboratory, laundry, maintenance facility, medical facility, museum, offices, parking area, physical education facility, recreational facility, research facility, storage facility, student union, study facility, theatre, utility or any combination of the foregoing;

“Project,” in the case of a private institution for higher education, also means, if such institution is organized not for profit, costs and expenses incurred by such institution in connection with the operation thereof, including, but not necessarily limited to, maintenance costs, heating and lighting expenditures, repair and replacement expenses, faculty salaries and administrative costs and expenses; provided, that any agreements entered into between the corporation and the institution as security for the payment of principal and interest on bonds issued to finance such a project must require that a borrowing institution shall repay all amounts received by it for such projects within two (2) years from the date such funds are received by it; provided, that the foregoing two-year limitation shall not apply in the case of bonds issued for the purpose of refinancing, or reimbursing, costs and expenses incurred by a private institution for higher education in connection with the operation by it of hospital and related facilities for the training of students enrolled in its medical education program; and provided further, that bonds for such refinancing or reimbursement purpose are not to be issued after July 1, 1994, but bonds, if any, issued for such purpose before such date shall, if issued in compliance with the other provisions hereof, be and remain valid, from and after such issuance termination date and shall not in any manner be limited or affected by such termination of issuance authority; provided, that the foregoing two-year limitation shall not apply in the case of bonds issued for the purpose of refinancing, or reimbursing, costs and expenses incurred by a private institution for higher education in connection with the operation by it of hospital and related facilities for the training of students enrolled in its medical education program; and provided further, that bonds for such refinancing or reimbursement purpose shall not be issued after July 1, 1995, but bonds, if any, issued for each purpose before such date shall, if issued in compliance with the other provisions hereof, be and remain valid, from and after such issuance termination date and shall not in any manner be limited or affected by such termination of issuance authority;

“Project” shall also include loans to a nonprofit corporation by any corporation receiving from the Tennessee state school bond authority pursuant to § 49-3-1210 allocation for the issuance of Qualified Zone Academy Bonds within the meaning of § 1397E of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 1397E) [repealed], when the proceeds of which are granted to or spent on behalf of one or more public institutions for higher education to pay costs of developing course materials for education and to train teachers and other school personnel. Such nonprofit corporation shall be deemed an institution for higher education for purposes of this part;

“Project,” in the case of a hospital institution, means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by a hospital institution in connection with its operations or proposed operations, including, without limitation, a site therefor, a communication facility, clinic, computer facility, congregate elderly facilities, dining hall, elderly housing, extended care facilities, firefighting facility, fire prevention facility, food service and preparation facility, health care facility, hospital, interns' residence, laboratory, laundry, maintenance facility, nurses' residence, nursing home, nonprofit home for the aged, nursing school, offices, parking area, pharmacy, recreational facility, research facility, storage facility, utility, x-ray facility, or any combination of the foregoing; and, also, funds to be used by any hospital institution organized not for profit in connection with the operation thereof, including, but not limited to, maintenance and supply costs, heating, lighting and other utility expenditures, repair and replacement expenses, employee compensation and administrative costs and expenses; furthermore, in the case of a hospital institution, “project” means the purchase of the accounts receivable of any hospital institution;

“Project,” in the case of an educational facility for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability, means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by an educational facility for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability in connection with its operation or proposed operations, including, without limitation, a site therefor, an academic facility, administrative facility, assembly halls, athletic facility, auditorium, campus, communications facility, continuing education facility, classrooms, dining halls, dormitory, exhibition halls, firefighting and fire prevention facility, food service and preparation facility, gymnasium, health care facility, hospital, housing, laboratory, laundry, maintenance facility, medical facilities, museum, offices, parking area, physical education facility, recreation facility, research facilities, storage, student union, study facility, theatre, utility, residence halls, or any combination of the foregoing;

“Project” also means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by a not for profit blood bank or blood center in connection with its operations or proposed operations;

“Project,” in the case of a housing facility, means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by a housing facility in connection with its operation or proposed operations, including, but not limited to, a site therefor, multi-family residential units, administrative facility, assembly halls, athletic facility, communications facility, dining and food service and preparation facility, gymnasium, health care facility, laundry, maintenance facility, parking area, recreation facility, storage, theatre, utility, or any combination of the foregoing;

“Project,” in the case of a housing facility, also means single family residential units for purchase where such units are financed by a for-profit, not-for-profit or governmental entity or any combination of such entities where payments to affected tax jurisdictions are made in lieu of property taxes in amounts equal to the property taxes which would be due if the property were fully taxable, and the bonds or notes for such financing shall:

Be purchased, guaranteed, or otherwise supported by a government sponsored mortgage entity participating in the residential mortgages market that are formed under a federal charter, whether owned by the federal government or by stockholders; and

Not be exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.); and

“Project,” in the case of a clinic, means a structure, facility, machinery, equipment or other property suitable for use by a clinic, including, without limitation, supporting facilities, including a site therefor, a computer facility, a laboratory, a maintenance facility, administrative offices, parking facilities, x-ray facilities, facilities for specialized diagnostic or out-patient treatment or any combination of the foregoing; and, funds to be used by any such clinic in connection with the operation thereof, including, but not limited to, maintenance and supply costs, heating, lighting and other utility expenditures, repair and replacement expenses, employee compensation and administrative costs and expenses; furthermore, in the case of a clinic, “project” means the purchase of the accounts receivable of any aforedescribed institution;

“Revenues” of a project, or derived from a project, include payments under a lease or sale contract and repayments under a loan agreement, or under notes, debentures, bonds and other secured or unsecured debt obligations of a lessee or contracting party delivered as herein provided; and

“Sale contract” means a contract providing for the sale of one (1) or more projects to one (1) or more contracting parties and includes a contract providing for payment of the purchase price in one (1) or more installments. If the sale contract permits title to the project to pass to the other contracting party or parties prior to payment in full of the entire purchase price, it shall also provide for the other contracting party or parties to deliver to the corporation or to the trustee under the indenture pursuant to which the bonds were issued one (1) or more notes, debentures, bonds or other secured or unsecured debt obligations of such contracting party or parties providing for timely payments, including, without limitation, interest thereon for the balance of the purchase price at or prior to the passage of such title.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 1; 1971, ch. 413, §§ 1-4; 1975, ch. 16, § 1; 1975, ch. 29, §§ 1, 2; 1975, ch. 262, § 1; 1976, ch. 514, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; 1982, ch. 629, § 1; 1982, ch. 947, § 2; 1983, ch. 76, § 1; 1983, ch. 187, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-1901; Acts 1985, ch. 243, § 1; 1985, ch. 307, § 1; 1988, ch. 1014, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 1086, §§ 1, 2; 1993, ch. 427, § 1; 1994, ch. 912, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-3-301; Acts 1999, ch. 41, § 1; 2000, ch. 979, § 1; 2000, ch. 986, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 373, § 1; 2010, ch. 977, §§ 1, 2; 2011, ch. 158, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

26 U.S.C. § 1397E, referred to in the definition of “project,” was repealed by Act Dec. 22, 2017, P.L. 115-97.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Municipal, State, and County Aid, § 2.

48-101-302. Purpose of part — Liberal construction.

It is hereby determined and declared that for the benefit of the people of the state of Tennessee, the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity and the improvement and maintenance of their health and living conditions, it is essential that the people of this state have access to adequate medical care and hospital facilities, that the elderly residents of the state be assisted, and that the youth of this state be given the fullest opportunity to learn and to develop their intellectual and mental capacities; that it is essential that hospital institutions and institutions for higher education within the state be provided with appropriate additional means to assist in the development and maintenance of the public health, especially for the elderly, and to assist such youth in achieving a higher level of learning and the development of their intellectual and mental capacities; that it is the purpose of this part to provide a measure of assistance and an alternative method to enable hospital institutions and institutions for higher education in the state of Tennessee to provide the facilities which are sorely needed to accomplish the purposes of this part, all to the public benefit and good, as more fully provided herein; and it is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this part to authorize the incorporation in the several municipalities in this state of public corporations to finance, acquire, own, lease and/or dispose of properties to the end that such corporations may be able to promote the health and higher education of the people of this state, and to vest such corporations with all powers that may be necessary to enable them to accomplish such purposes. It is not intended hereby that any such corporation shall itself be authorized to operate any such enterprise. This part shall be liberally construed in conformity with such intention.

In conjunction with the above purposes of this part, it is further determined and declared that it is for the benefit of the people of the state of Tennessee, the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity and the improvement and maintenance of their health and living conditions, that provision be made for additional facilities for educational training and related facilities for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability; that provision should be made for appropriate educational means to assist in the development and maintenance of the physical and mental health of the affected individuals and the development of their mental and intellectual capacities to the extent that they may be actively involved and participate in the normal day-to-day functions of the citizens of the state of Tennessee, and that it is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this part to facilitate the foregoing purposes stated herein and above.

In conjunction with the above purposes of this part, it is further determined and declared that it is for the benefit of the people of the state of Tennessee, the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity and the improvement and maintenance of their health and living conditions, that provision be made for additional safe and sanitary multi-family housing facilities to be used by persons of low and/or moderate income; that provisions should be made for appropriate safe and sanitary housing of the affected individuals and the improvement of their living standards to the extent that they may be actively involved and participate in the normal day-to-day functions of the citizens of the state of Tennessee, and that it is the intent of the general assembly by the passage of this part to facilitate the foregoing purposes stated herein to the fullest extent allowed the several states of the union pursuant to the laws and regulations of the United States.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 2; 1975, ch. 29, § 3; 1976, ch. 514, § 2; 1982, ch. 947, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 48-1902, 48-3-302; Acts 2011, ch. 158, § 22.

48-101-303. Application for incorporation.

Whenever any number of natural persons, not less than three (3), each of whom shall be a duly qualified elector of and taxpayer in the municipality, shall file with the governing body thereof an application in writing seeking permission to apply for the incorporation of a health, educational and housing facility corporation of such municipality, the governing body shall proceed to consider such application.

If the governing body shall, by appropriate resolution duly adopted, find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the corporation be formed and shall authorize the persons making such application to proceed to form such corporation and shall approve the form of certificate of incorporation proposed to be used in organizing the corporation, then the persons making such application shall execute, acknowledge and file a certificate of incorporation for the corporation as hereinafter provided.

No corporation may be formed unless such application shall have first been filed with the governing body of the municipality and the governing body shall have adopted a resolution as provided in this section.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 3; 1982, ch. 947, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 48-1903, 48-3-303.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-304. Certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation shall set forth:

The names and residences of the applicants, together with a recital that each of them is an elector of and taxpayer in the municipality;

The name of the corporation which shall be The Health, Educational and Housing Facility Board of the of (the blanks to be filled in with the name of the municipality), if such name shall be available for use by the corporation and if not available then the incorporators shall designate some other similar name that is available;

A recital that permission to organize the corporation has been granted by resolution duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality and the date of the adoption of such resolution;

The location of the principal office of the corporation (which shall be in the municipality);

The purposes for which the corporation is proposed to be organized;

The number of directors of the corporation;

The period, if any, for the duration of the corporation; and

Any other matter which the applicants may choose to insert therein which shall not be inconsistent with this part or with the laws of the state of Tennessee.

The certificate of incorporation shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each of the applicants before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 4; 1982, ch. 947, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 48-1904, 48-3-304.

48-101-305. Filing of certificate of incorporation.

When executed and acknowledged in conformity with § 48-101-304, the certificate of incorporation shall be filed with the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the certificate of incorporation and, if the secretary of state finds that the recitals contained therein are correct, that the requirements of § 48-101-304 have been complied with, and that the name is not identical with or so nearly similar to that of another corporation already in existence in this state as to lead to confusion and uncertainty, the secretary of state shall approve the certificate of incorporation and record it in an appropriate book or record in the secretary of state's office. When such certificate has been so made, filed and approved, the applicants shall constitute a public corporation under the name set out in the certificate of incorporation.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 48-1905, 48-3-305.

48-101-306. Amendment of certificate of incorporation.

The certificate of incorporation may at any time and from time to time be amended so as to make any changes therein and add any provisions thereto which might have been included in the certificate of incorporation in the first instance. Any such amendment shall be effected in the following manner:

The members of the board of directors of the corporation shall file with the governing body of the municipality an application in writing seeking permission to amend the certificate of incorporation, specifying in such application the amendment proposed to be made;

Such governing body shall consider such application and, if it shall by appropriate resolution duly find and determine that it is wise, expedient, necessary or advisable that the proposed amendment be made and shall authorize the same to be made, and shall approve the form of the proposed amendment, then the persons making such application shall execute an instrument embodying the amendment specified in such application, and shall file the same with the secretary of state;

The proposed amendment shall be subscribed and acknowledged by each member of the board of directors before an officer authorized by the laws of Tennessee to take acknowledgments to deeds;

The secretary of state shall thereupon examine the proposed amendment and, if the secretary of state finds that the requirements of this section have been complied with and the proposed amendment is within the scope of what might be included in an original certificate of incorporation, the secretary of state shall approve the amendment and record it in an appropriate book in the secretary of state's office;

When such amendment has been so made, filed and approved, it shall thereupon become effective and the certificate of incorporation shall thereupon be amended to the extent provided in the amendment.

No certificate of incorporation shall be amended except in the manner provided in this section.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 48-1906, 48-3-306.

48-101-307. Board of directors.

The corporation shall have a board of directors in which all powers of the corporation shall be vested and which shall consist of any number of directors, not less than seven (7), all of whom shall be duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the municipality.

The directors shall serve as such without compensation except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties hereunder.

No director shall be an officer or employee of the municipality.

The directors shall be elected by the governing body of the municipality, and they shall be so elected that they shall hold office for staggered terms. At the time of the election of the first board of directors, the governing body of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, and thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor thereto shall not have been elected, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall continue to hold office until a successor shall be so elected.

The directors shall meet and organize as a board and shall elect one (1) of its members as chair, one (1) as vice chair, one (1) as treasurer and one (1) as secretary and such officers shall annually be elected thereafter in like manner.

The duties of secretary and treasurer may be performed by the same director.

Any action taken by the directors under this part may be authorized by resolution at any regular or special meeting, and such resolution shall take effect immediately and need not be published or posted.

Any meeting held by the board of directors for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, §§ 7, 8; 1975, ch. 29, § 4; 1976, ch. 514, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 48-1907, 48-1908, 48-3-307.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-308. Powers of corporations.

The corporation has the following powers, together with all powers incidental thereto or necessary for the performance of those hereinafter stated, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the certificate of incorporation, unless sooner dissolved as hereinafter provided;

Sue and be sued and prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the same at pleasure;

Acquire, whether by purchase, construction, exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, and improve, maintain, extend, equip and furnish one (1) or more projects, which projects may be either within or without the corporate limits of the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized, including all real and personal properties which the board of directors of the corporation may deem necessary in connection therewith and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence;

Finance or undertake one (1) or more projects, which may be located in one (1) or more municipalities in this state or outside this state, for one (1) or more institutions described in § 48-101-301. However:

No project located in this state, but outside the corporate limits of the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized, may be financed or undertaken except after the approval of the financing or undertaking thereof by appropriate resolution duly adopted by either:

A corporation organized pursuant to this part by any municipality within the corporate limits of which the project is located; or

The governing body of any municipality within the corporate limits of which the project is located; and

No project located outside this state may be financed or undertaken unless the hospital institution or institution of higher education for which the project is financed or undertaken maintains its principal place of business in this state prior to issuance of the debt and throughout the entire life of the debt;

Lease to a hospital institution, clinic, not for profit blood bank or blood center, or an institution for higher education or a housing facility, one (1) or more projects upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors shall deem proper and charge and collect rent therefor and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations thereof; and include in any such lease, if desired, provisions that the lessee thereof shall have options to renew the term of the lease for such period or periods and at such rent as shall be determined by the board of directors of the corporation and/or to purchase any or all of its projects or that, upon payment of all of the indebtedness of the corporation, it may lease or convey any or all of its projects to the lessees thereof with or without consideration;

Sell to a hospital institution, clinic, not for profit blood bank or blood center, or an institution for higher education or a housing facility or educational institution for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability, one (1) or more projects for such payments and upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may deem advisable in accordance with sale contracts entered into pursuant to this part;

Enter into loan agreements with a hospital institution, clinic, not for profit blood bank or blood center, or an institution for higher education or educational institutions for individuals with physical and/or intellectual disability or a housing facility with respect to one (1) or more projects for such payments and upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may deem advisable in accordance with this part;

Sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its properties whenever its board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the corporation was organized;

Borrow money and issue its bonds for the purpose of carrying out any of its powers;

As security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds so issued and any agreements made in connection therewith, mortgage and pledge any or all of its projects or any part or parts thereof, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge the revenues and receipts therefrom or from any thereof, and/or assign and pledge all or any part of its interest in and rights under the leases, sale contracts or loan agreements relating thereto or to any thereof;

Employ and pay compensation to such employees and agents, including attorneys, as the board of directors shall deem necessary for the business of the corporation;

Exercise all powers expressly given in its certificate of incorporation and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the certificate of incorporation or this part, deemed expedient for the management of the corporation's affairs; and

Provide information in accordance with § 9-21-134.

The corporation does not have power to operate any project financed under this part as a business or in any manner except as specifically provided in this part.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 8; 1975, ch. 29, § 4; 1976, ch. 514, § 3; 1982, ch. 629, §§ 2, 3; 1982, ch. 947, § 6; 1983, ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 48-1908; Acts 1990, ch. 704, § 1; T.C.A., § 48-3-308; Acts 2010, ch. 977, § 3; 2011, ch. 158, § 23; 2015, ch. 91, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. This section is set out in the supplement to update an internal reference.

Law Reviews.

Two Methods of Financing Health Care Facilities, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 118.

48-101-309. Terms of contracts.

Any lease, sale contract or loan agreement with respect to a project entered into pursuant to this part shall be for a term not shorter than the longest maturity of any bonds issued to finance such project, and shall provide for revenues adequate to pay principal of and interest on such bonds as the same falls due and to pay such portion of the operating expenses of the corporation as the board of directors shall determine to be necessary.

Acts 1969, ch. 333, § 8; 1975, ch. 29, § 4; 1976, ch. 514, § 3; 1982, ch. 629, §§ 2, 3; 1982, ch. 947, § 6; 1983, ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., §§ 48-1908, 48-3-309.